Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.320

Western College fund—Moneys transferred to general fund.

All moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the Western College fund on the first day of May, 1955, and all moneys thereafter paid into the state treasury for or to the credit of the Western College fund, shall be and are hereby transferred to and placed in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.320. Prior: 1955 c 335 s 1.]